North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 7. Opinions and Expert Testimony.

Rule 701.
Opinion testimony by lay witness.

If the witness is not testifying as an expert, his testimony in the form of opinions or inferences is limited to those opinions or inferences which are (a) rationally based on the perception of the witness and (b) helpful to a clear understanding of his testimony or the determination of a fact in issue.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 701.

Limitation (a) retains the traditional requirement that lay opinion be based on firsthand knowledge or observation. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence,
§ 122, at 468 (1982).

Limitation (b) is phrased in terms of requiring testimony to be helpful in resolving issues. This is a different test from the more traditional “collective facts exception” which allows lay opinions or inferences only where a shorthand expression is “necessary” because articulation of more primary components is impossible or highly impracticable. P. Rothstein,
Rules of Evidence for United States Courts and Magistrates,
at 257 (1980). See

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 125, at 474-76 (1982). Nothing in the rule would bar evidence that is commonly referred to as a “shorthand statement of fact.”

Id.

at 476.

As the Advisory Committee’s Note points out:

“[N]ecessity as a standard for permitting opinions and conclusions has proved too elusive and too unadaptable to particular situations for purposes of satisfactory judicial administration. The rule assumes that the natural characteristics of the adversary system will generally lead to an acceptable result, since the detailed account carries more conviction than the broad assertion, and a lawyer can be expected to display his witness to the best advantage. If he fails to do so, cross-examination and argument will point up the weakness. * * * If, despite these considerations, attempts are made to introduce meaningless assertions which amount to little more than choosing up sides, exclusion for lack of helpfulness is called for by the rule.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Evidence on Fire,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 483 (2019).

Rule 702.
Testimony by experts.

If scientific, technical or other specialized knowledge will assist the trier of fact to understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue, a witness qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill, experience, training, or education, may testify thereto in the form of an opinion, or otherwise, if all of the following apply:

The testimony is based upon sufficient facts or data.

The testimony is the product of reliable principles and methods.

The witness has applied the principles and methods reliably to the facts of the case.

(a1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a witness may give expert testimony solely on the issue of impairment and not on the issue of specific alcohol concentration level relating to the following:

(1)

The results of a Horizontal Gaze Nystagmus (HGN) Test when the test is administered in accordance with the person’s training by a person who has successfully completed training in HGN.

(2)

Whether a person was under the influence of one or more impairing substances, and the category of such impairing substance or substances, if the witness holds a current certification as a Drug Recognition Expert, issued by the State Department of Health and Human Services.

In a medical malpractice action as defined in G.S. 90-21.11, a person shall not give expert testimony on the appropriate standard of health care as defined in G.S. 90-21.12 unless the person is a licensed health care provider in this State or another state and meets the following criteria:

If the party against whom or on whose behalf the testimony is offered is a specialist, the expert witness must:

Specialize in the same specialty as the party against whom or on whose behalf the testimony is offered; or

Specialize in a similar specialty which includes within its specialty the performance of the procedure that is the subject of the complaint and have prior experience treating similar patients.

During the year immediately preceding the date of the occurrence that is the basis for the action, the expert witness must have devoted a majority of his or her professional time to either or both of the following:

The active clinical practice of the same health profession in which the party against whom or on whose behalf the testimony is offered, and if that party is a specialist, the active clinical practice of the same specialty or a similar specialty which includes within its specialty the performance of the procedure that is the subject of the complaint and have prior experience treating similar patients; or

The instruction of students in an accredited health professional school or accredited residency or clinical research program in the same health profession in which the party against whom or on whose behalf the testimony is offered, and if that party is a specialist, an accredited health professional school or accredited residency or clinical research program in the same specialty.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, if the party against whom or on whose behalf the testimony is offered is a general practitioner, the expert witness, during the year immediately preceding the date of the occurrence that is the basis for the action, must have devoted a majority of his or her professional time to either or both of the following:

Active clinical practice as a general practitioner; or

Instruction of students in an accredited health professional school or accredited residency or clinical research program in the general practice of medicine.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a physician who qualifies as an expert under subsection (a) of this Rule and who by reason of active clinical practice or instruction of students has knowledge of the applicable standard of care for nurses, nurse practitioners, certified registered nurse anesthetists, certified registered nurse midwives, physician assistants, or other medical support staff may give expert testimony in a medical malpractice action with respect to the standard of care of which he is knowledgeable of nurses, nurse practitioners, certified registered nurse anesthetists, certified registered nurse midwives, physician assistants licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, or other medical support staff.

Upon motion by either party, a resident judge of the superior court in the county or judicial district in which the action is pending may allow expert testimony on the appropriate standard of health care by a witness who does not meet the requirements of subsection (b) or (c) of this Rule, but who is otherwise qualified as an expert witness, upon a showing by the movant of extraordinary circumstances and a determination by the court that the motion should be allowed to serve the ends of justice.

In an action alleging medical malpractice, an expert witness shall not testify on a contingency fee basis.

This section does not limit the power of the trial court to disqualify an expert witness on grounds other than the qualifications set forth in this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, in a medical malpractice action as defined in G.S. 90-21.11(2)b. against a hospital, or other health care or medical facility, a person shall not give expert testimony on the appropriate standard of care as to administrative or other nonclinical issues unless the person has substantial knowledge, by virtue of his or her training and experience, about the standard of care among hospitals, or health care or medical facilities, of the same type as the hospital, or health care or medical facility, whose actions or inactions are the subject of the testimony situated in the same or similar communities at the time of the alleged act giving rise to the cause of action.

A witness qualified as an expert in accident reconstruction who has performed a reconstruction of a crash, or has reviewed the report of investigation, with proper foundation may give an opinion as to the speed of a vehicle even if the witness did not observe the vehicle moving.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 1995, c. 309, s. 1; 2006-253, s. 6; 2007-493, s. 5; 2011-283, s. 1.3; 2011-400, s. 4; 2017-57, s. 17.8(b); 2017-212, s. 5.3.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 702, except that the words “or otherwise” which appear at the end of the federal rule after the word “opinion” have been deleted.

The rule is identical to G.S. 8-58.13, which should be repealed when Rule 702 becomes effective. The rule is consistent with North Carolina practice.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 134, at 520, n. 25 (1982).

Rule 703.
Bases of opinion testimony by experts.

The facts or data in the particular case upon which an expert bases an opinion or inference may be those perceived by or made known to him at or before the hearing. If of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the particular field in forming opinions or inferences upon the subject, the facts or data need not be admissible in evidence.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 703.

Under the rule, facts or data upon which an expert bases an opinion may be derived from three possible sources. The first is the personal observation of the witness. The second source is presentation at trial by a hypothetical question or by having the expert attend the trial and hear the testimony establishing the facts. The third source consists of presentation of data to the expert outside of court. See Comment,
Expert Medical Testimony: Differences Between the North Carolina Rules and the Federal Rules of Evidence
12 W.F.L.R. 833, 837 (1976).

In
State
v.

Wade,

296 N.C. 454

(1978), the Court stated that a “physician, as an expert witness, may give his opinion, including a diagnosis, based either on personal knowledge or observation or on information supplied him by others, including the patient, if such information is inherently reliable even though it is not independently admissible into evidence.” Although the rule requires that the facts or data “be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the particular field” rather than that they be “inherently reliable,” the thrust of

State

v.

Wade

is consistent with the rule. See W. Blakey,

Examination of Expert Witnesses in North Carolina,

61 N.C.L.Rev. 1, 20-32 (1982).

The rule provides that the facts or data need not be admissible in evidence if of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the particular field. In
State
v.

Wade

the Court stated that: “If his opinion is admissible the expert may testify to the information he relied on in forming it for the purpose of showing the basis of the opinion.” Thus an expert may testify as to the facts upon which his opinion is based, even though the facts would not be admissible as substantive evidence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the syllogistic structure of scientific testimony, see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1988).

For a practice-oriented discussion of impeachment of hearsay declarants by trial judges and attorneys, with observations on the extension of Rule 806 to Rule 703, see 13 Campbell L. Rev. 157 (1991).

For survey, “State v. Daniels: Chief Justice Exum’s Quantum Theory of Expert Psychiatric Testimony,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2326 (1995).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For comment, “Corrosion of the Confrontation Clause in North Carolina:
A Comparison of State v. Brewington and State v. Ortiz-Zape with State v. Craven,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 295 (2014).

Rule 704.
Opinion on ultimate issue.

Testimony in the form of an opinion or inference is not objectionable because it embraces an ultimate issue to be decided by the trier of fact.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 704.

The rule would abrogate the doctrine that excludes evidence in the form of an opinion if it purports to resolve the “ultimate issue” to be decided by the trier of fact.

In
State
v.

Wilkerson,

295 N.C. 559

(1978), the Court held that admissibility of expert opinion depends not on whether it would invade the jury’s province, but rather on “whether the witness . . . is in a better position to have an opinion . . . than is the trier of fact.” Professor Brandis states that: “It is hoped that a comparable reexamination of the rule as applied to lay testimony will be forthcoming. The rule has been condemned by thoughtful commentators, and judicial expressions of doubt are not wanting.”

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 126, at 480-81 (1982) (footnotes omitted).

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The abolition of the ultimate issue rule does not lower the bars so as to admit all opinions. Under Rules 701 and 702, opinions must be helpful to the trier of fact, and Rule 403 provides for exclusion of evidence which wastes time. These provisions afford ample assurance against the admission of opinions which would merely tell the jury what result to reach, somewhat in the manner of the oath-helpers of an earlier day. They also stand ready to exclude opinions phrased in terms of inadequately explored legal criteria. Thus the question, ‘Did T have capacity to make a will?’ would be excluded, while the question, ‘Did T have sufficient mental capacity to know the nature and extent of his property and the natural objects of his bounty and to formulate a rational scheme of distribution?’ would be allowed. McCormick § 12.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

Rule 705.
Disclosure of facts or data underlying expert opinion.

The expert may testify in terms of opinion or inference and give his reasons therefor without prior disclosure of the underlying facts or data, unless an adverse party requests otherwise, in which event the expert will be required to disclose such underlying facts or data on direct examination or voir dire before stating the opinion. The expert may in any event be required to disclose the underlying facts or data on cross-examination. There shall be no requirement that expert testimony be in response to a hypothetical question.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 705 in two respects.

Fed. R. Evid. 705 leaves it to the court, rather than opposing counsel, to determine whether to require prior disclosure of the underlying facts. Rule 705 is consistent with G.S. 8-58.14, which should be repealed after the rule is adopted.

The second difference is that the last sentence of this rule does not appear in the Fed. R. Evid. 705. This sentence is identical to G.S. 8-58.12 which should be repealed after this rule is adopted. Although hypothetical questions are no longer required, neither the rule nor G.S. 8-58.12 prohibits their voluntary use.

Prior to 1982, when the facts upon which an opinion was based were within the expert’s own knowledge, the court had discretion to permit the expert to give his opinion first and leave the facts to be brought out by cross-examination.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 136 (1982). Facts not within the personal knowledge of the expert had to be incorporated into a hypothetical question and thus disclosed prior to the opinion.

Id.

The 1981 legislation eliminated the requirement of the hypothetical question and allowed the expert to give his opinion without prior disclosure of the underlying facts unless an adverse party requests otherwise. G.S. 8-58.14 [now repealed]. Upon the request of an adverse party, the judge must require the expert to disclose the underlying facts on direct examination or

voir dire

before stating the opinion. This rule continues that requirement.

The second sentence of Rule 705 gives the opposing side the right to require disclosure of the underlying facts or data on cross-examination. The cross-examiner is under no compulsion to bring out any facts or data except those unfavorable to the opinion. N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 26(b)(4) provides for substantial discovery of the facts underlying the opinion prior to trial.

Under Rule 611, the court exercises control over the mode and order of interrogating witnesses and presenting evidence. The court may allow the opposing party to cross-examine concerning the factual basis of the opinion immediately after the opinion is given rather than at a later point in the trial.

Except where an adverse party requests it, this rule eliminates the requirement that the basis of an expert opinion must be stated. However, the requirement that there must be a basis for the expert opinion would not be abolished. See W. Blakey,
Examination of Expert Witnesses in North Carolina,
61 N.C.L.Rev. 1, 9 (1982).

Rule 706.
Court appointed experts.

Appointment. — The court may on its own motion or on the motion of any party enter an order to show cause why expert witnesses should not be appointed, and may request the parties to submit nominations. The court may appoint any expert witnesses agreed upon by the parties, and may appoint witnesses of its own selection. An expert witness shall not be appointed by the court unless he consents to act. A witness so appointed shall be informed of his duties by the court in writing, a copy of which shall be filed with the clerk, or at a conference in which the parties shall have opportunity to participate. A witness so appointed shall advise the parties of his findings, if any; his deposition may be taken by any party; and he may be called to testify by the court or any party. He shall be subject to cross-examination by each party, including a party calling him as a witness.

Compensation. — Expert witnesses so appointed are entitled to reasonable compensation in whatever sum the court may allow. The compensation thus fixed is payable from funds which may be provided by law in criminal cases and civil actions and proceedings involving just compensation for the taking of property. In other civil actions and proceedings the compensation shall be paid by the parties in such proportion and at such time as the court directs, and thereafter charged in like manner as other costs.

Disclosure of appointment. — In the exercise of its discretion, the court may authorize disclosure to the jury of the fact that the court appointed the expert witness.

Parties’ experts of own selection. — Nothing in this rule limits the parties in calling expert witnesses of their own selection.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 706 except that “for the taking of property” has been inserted in subdivision (b) in lieu of “under the Fifth Amendment”.

A trial judge has the discretion to call an expert witness.
State
v.

Horne,

171 N.C. 787

(1916). This rule provides the procedure for calling such a witness.

Subdivision (b) provides the method of compensating experts called by the court but does not require an additional appropriation.